Pennsylvania, session 2025-2026, SB1282.
hereby enacts as follows:Section 1. Title 75 of the Pennsylvania Consolidated Statutes is amended by adding a section to read:§ 3701.2. Protection of children from second-hand smoke in vehicles.(a) Prohibition.--An individual may not smoke in a vehicle that is transporting a child under 12 years of age.(b) Penalty.--(1) An individual who violates subsection (a) commits a summary offense and shall, upon conviction, be sentenced to pay a fine of $100.(2) An individual who commits a second or subsequent offense after being convicted under paragraph (1) commits a summary offense and shall, upon conviction, be sentenced to 12345678910111213141516171819 pay a fine of $250.(c) Limitation.--An individual may not be convicted of an offense under subsection (a) unless the individual is also convicted of another offense under this title that occurred at the same time.(d) Definition.--As used in this section, the term "smoke" means to carry a lighted cigar, cigarette, pipe or other smoking device.Section 2. This act shall take effect in 90 days.20260SB1282PN1609 - 2 - 123456789